District of Columbia statutes.
46-351.03

Tribunal and support enforcement agency of the District.

(a)

The Family Division of the Superior Court of the District of Columbia is the tribunal of the District.

(b)

The Office of the Attorney General is the support enforcement agency of the District.

Feb. 27, 2016, D.C. Law 21-73, § 103, 63 DCR 222